pt-BR: Cone pirométrico faixa: Cone 010; Cone 011; Cone 012; Cone 013; Cone 014; Cone 015; Cone 016; Cone 017; Cone 018; Cone 019; Cone 020; Cone 021; Cone 022; Cone 03; Cone 04; Cone 05; Cone 06; Cone 07; Cone 08; Cone 09; Outro
nl: Pyrometrische kegel bereik: Cone 010; Cone 011; Cone 012; Cone 013; Cone 014; Cone 015; Cone 016; Cone 017; Cone 018; Cone 019; Cone 020; Cone 021; Cone 022; Cone 03; Cone 04; Cone 05; Cone 06; Cone 07; Cone 08; Cone 09; Overig
ru: Диапазон пирометрических конусов: Конус 010; Конус 011; Конус 012; Конус 013; Конус 014; Конус 015; Конус 016; Конус 017; Конус 018; Конус 019; Конус 020; Конус 021; Конус 022; Конус 03; Конус 04; Конус 05; Конус 06; Конус 07; Конус 08; Конус 09; Другое
th: ช่วงกรวยไพโรมิเตอร์: โคน 010; โคน 011; โคน 012; โคน 013; โคน 014; โคน 015; โคน 016; โคน 017; โคน 018; โคน 019; โคน 020; โคน 021; โคน 022; โคน 03; โคน 04; โคน 05; โคน 06; โคน 07; โคน 08; โคน 09; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Gama conului pirometric: Con 010; Con 011; Con 012; Con 013; Con 014; Con 015; Con 016; Con 017; Con 018; Con 019; Con 020; Con 021; Con 022; Con 03; Con 04; Con 05; Con 06; Con 07; Con 08; Con 09; Altele
ja: 高温測定コーン範囲: コーン 010; コーン 011; コーン 012; コーン 013; コーン 014; コーン 015; コーン 016; コーン 017; コーン 018; コーン 019; コーン 020; コーン 021; コーン 022; コーン 03; コーン 04; コーン 05; コーン 06; コーン 07; コーン 08; コーン 09; その他
el: Εύρος πυρομετρικών κώνων: Κώνος 010; Κώνος 011; Κώνος 012; Κώνος 013; Κώνος 014; Κώνος 015; Κώνος 016; Κώνος 017; Κώνος 018; Κώνος 019; Κώνος 020; Κώνος 021; Κώνος 022; Κώνος 03; Κώνος 04; Κώνος 05; Κώνος 06; Κώνος 07; Κώνος 08; Κώνος 09; Άλλο
zh-CN: 测温锥温区范围: 010 号测温锥; 011 号测温锥; 012 号测温锥; 013 号测温锥; 014 号测温锥; 015 号测温锥; 016 号测温锥; 017 号测温锥; 018 号测温锥; 019 号测温锥; 020 号测温锥; 021 号测温锥; 022 号测温锥; 03 号测温锥; 04 号测温锥; 05 号测温锥; 06 号测温锥; 07 号测温锥; 08 号测温锥; 09 号测温锥; 其他
sl-SI: Temperaturni razpon pirometričnih stožcev: Stožec 010; Stožec 011; Stožec 012; Stožec 013; Stožec 014; Stožec 015; Stožec 016; Stožec 017; Stožec 018; Stožec 019; Stožec 020; Stožec 021; Stožec 022; Stožec 03; Stožec 04; Stožec 05; Stožec 06; Stožec 07; Stožec 08; Stožec 09; Drugo
it: Intervallo del cono pirometrico: Cono 010; Cono 011; Cono 012; Cono 013; Cono 014; Cono 015; Cono 016; Cono 017; Cono 018; Cono 019; Cono 020; Cono 021; Cono 022; Cono 03; Cono 04; Cono 05; Cono 06; Cono 07; Cono 08; Cono 09; Altro
pl: Zakres stożków pirometrycznych: Stożek 010; Stożek 011; Stożek 012; Stożek 013; Stożek 014; Stożek 015; Stożek 016; Stożek 017; Stożek 018; Stożek 019; Stożek 020; Stożek 021; Stożek 022; Stożek 03; Stożek 04; Stożek 05; Stożek 06; Stożek 07; Stożek 08; Stożek 09; Inne
es: Rango de conos pirométricos: Cono 010; Cono 011; Cono 012; Cono 013; Cono 014; Cono 015; Cono 016; Cono 017; Cono 018; Cono 019; Cono 020; Cono 021; Cono 022; Cono 03; Cono 04; Cono 05; Cono 06; Cono 07; Cono 08; Cono 09; Otro
tr: Pirometrik koni aralığı: Koni 010; Koni 011; Koni 012; Koni 013; Koni 014; Koni 015; Koni 016; Koni 017; Koni 018; Koni 019; Koni 020; Koni 021; Koni 022; Koni 03; Koni 04; Koni 05; Koni 06; Koni 07; Koni 08; Koni 09; Diğer
lt-LT: Pirometrinių kūgių diapazonas: Kūgis 010; Kūgis 011; Kūgis 012; Kūgis 013; Kūgis 014; Kūgis 015; Kūgis 016; Kūgis 017; Kūgis 018; Kūgis 019; Kūgis 020; Kūgis 021; Kūgis 022; Kūgis 03; Kūgis 04; Kūgis 05; Kūgis 06; Kūgis 07; Kūgis 08; Kūgis 09; Kita
zh-TW: 測溫錐範圍: 010 號測溫錐; 011 號測溫錐; 012 號測溫錐; 013 號測溫錐; 014 號測溫錐; 015 號測溫錐; 016 號測溫錐; 017 號測溫錐; 018 號測溫錐; 019 號測溫錐; 020 號測溫錐; 021 號測溫錐; 022 號測溫錐; 03 號測溫錐; 04 號測溫錐; 05 號測溫錐; 06 號測溫錐; 07 號測溫錐; 08 號測溫錐; 09 號測溫錐; 其他
sk-SK: Rozsah pyrometrického kužeľa: Žiaromierka 010; Žiaromierka 011; Žiaromierka 012; Žiaromierka 013; Žiaromierka 014; Žiaromierka 015; Žiaromierka 016; Žiaromierka 017; Žiaromierka 018; Žiaromierka 019; Žiaromierka 020; Žiaromierka 021; Žiaromierka 022; Žiaromierka 03; Žiaromierka 04; Žiaromierka 05; Žiaromierka 06; Žiaromierka 07; Žiaromierka 08; Žiaromierka 09; Iné
bg-BG: Диапазон на пирометричния конус: Конус 010; Конус 011; Конус 012; Конус 013; Конус 014; Конус 015; Конус 016; Конус 017; Конус 018; Конус 019; Конус 020; Конус 021; Конус 022; Конус 03; Конус 04; Конус 05; Конус 06; Конус 07; Конус 08; Конус 09; Друго
vi: Phạm vi nón đo nhiệt độ: Nón 010; Nón 011; Nón 012; Nón 013; Nón 014; Nón 015; Nón 016; Nón 017; Nón 018; Nón 019; Nón 020; Nón 021; Nón 022; Nón 03; Nón 04; Nón 05; Nón 06; Nón 07; Nón 08; Nón 09; Khác
en: Pyrometric cone range: Cone 010; Cone 011; Cone 012; Cone 013; Cone 014; Cone 015; Cone 016; Cone 017; Cone 018; Cone 019; Cone 020; Cone 021; Cone 022; Cone 03; Cone 04; Cone 05; Cone 06; Cone 07; Cone 08; Cone 09; Other
ko: 파이로메트릭 콘 범위: 콘 010; 콘 011; 콘 012; 콘 013; 콘 014; 콘 015; 콘 016; 콘 017; 콘 018; 콘 019; 콘 020; 콘 021; 콘 022; 콘 03; 콘 04; 콘 05; 콘 06; 콘 07; 콘 08; 콘 09; 기타
pt-PT: Intervalo de cones pirométricos: Cone 010; Cone 011; Cone 012; Cone 013; Cone 014; Cone 015; Cone 016; Cone 017; Cone 018; Cone 019; Cone 020; Cone 021; Cone 022; Cone 03; Cone 04; Cone 05; Cone 06; Cone 07; Cone 08; Cone 09; Outro
fi: Pyrometrinen kartioalue: Kartio 010; Kartio 011; Kartio 012; Kartio 013; Kartio 014; Kartio 015; Kartio 016; Kartio 017; Kartio 018; Kartio 019; Kartio 020; Kartio 021; Kartio 022; Kartio 03; Kartio 04; Kartio 05; Kartio 06; Kartio 07; Kartio 08; Kartio 09; Muu
da: Seeger-kegleområde: Kegle 010; Kegle 011; Kegle 012; Kegle 013; Kegle 014; Kegle 015; Kegle 016; Kegle 017; Kegle 018; Kegle 019; Kegle 020; Kegle 021; Kegle 022; Kegle 03; Kegle 04; Kegle 05; Kegle 06; Kegle 07; Kegle 08; Kegle 09; Andet
cs: Rozsah pyrometrického kužele: Kužel 010; Kužel 011; Kužel 012; Kužel 013; Kužel 014; Kužel 015; Kužel 016; Kužel 017; Kužel 018; Kužel 019; Kužel 020; Kužel 021; Kužel 022; Kužel 03; Kužel 04; Kužel 05; Kužel 06; Kužel 07; Kužel 08; Kužel 09; Jiné
fr: Plage de cônes pyrométriques: Cône 010; Cône 011; Cône 012; Cône 013; Cône 014; Cône 015; Cône 016; Cône 017; Cône 018; Cône 019; Cône 020; Cône 021; Cône 022; Cône 03; Cône 04; Cône 05; Cône 06; Cône 07; Cône 08; Cône 09; Autre
hr-HR: Raspon pirometrijske konusne strukture: Konus 010; Konus 011; Konus 012; Konus 013; Konus 014; Konus 015; Konus 016; Konus 017; Konus 018; Konus 019; Konus 020; Konus 021; Konus 022; Konus 03; Konus 04; Konus 05; Konus 06; Konus 07; Konus 08; Konus 09; Ostalo
nb: Pyrometrisk kjegleområde: Kjegle 010; Kjegle 011; Kjegle 012; Kjegle 013; Kjegle 014; Kjegle 015; Kjegle 016; Kjegle 017; Kjegle 018; Kjegle 019; Kjegle 020; Kjegle 021; Kjegle 022; Kjegle 03; Kjegle 04; Kjegle 05; Kjegle 06; Kjegle 07; Kjegle 08; Kjegle 09; Annet
de: Pyrometrischer Kegelbereich: Kegel 010; Kegel 011; Kegel 012; Kegel 013; Kegel 014; Kegel 015; Kegel 016; Kegel 017; Kegel 018; Kegel 019; Kegel 020; Kegel 021; Kegel 022; Kegel 03; Kegel 04; Kegel 05; Kegel 06; Kegel 07; Kegel 08; Kegel 09; Sonstige
sv: Pyrometriskt konintervall: Kägla 010; Kägla 011; Kägla 012; Kägla 013; Kägla 014; Kägla 015; Kägla 016; Kägla 017; Kägla 018; Kägla 019; Kägla 020; Kägla 021; Kägla 022; Kägla 03; Kägla 04; Kägla 05; Kägla 06; Kägla 07; Kägla 08; Kägla 09; Övrigt
hu: Pirometrikus kúp tartománya: Kúp 010; Kúp 011; Kúp 012; Kúp 013; Kúp 014; Kúp 015; Kúp 016; Kúp 017; Kúp 018; Kúp 019; Kúp 020; Kúp 021; Kúp 022; Kúp 03; Kúp 04; Kúp 05; Kúp 06; Kúp 07; Kúp 08; Kúp 09; Egyéb